Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.005

Information for students and parents.

(1) Each school within a school district shall inform the students and the parents of the students enrolled in the school about: The benefits of regular school attendance; the potential effects of excessive absenteeism, whether excused or unexcused, on academic achievement, and graduation and dropout rates; the school's expectations of the parents and guardians to ensure regular school attendance by the child; the resources available to assist the child and the parents and guardians; the role and responsibilities of the school; and the consequences of truancy, including the compulsory education requirements under this chapter. The school shall provide access to the information before or at the time of enrollment of the child at a new school and at the beginning of each school year. If the school regularly and ordinarily communicates most other information to parents online, providing online access to the information required by this section satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in written form. Reasonable efforts must be made to enable parents to request and receive the information in a language in which they are fluent. A parent must date and acknowledge review of this information online or in writing before or at the time of enrollment of the child at a new school and at the beginning of each school year.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a template that schools may use to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section and shall post the information on its website.

[ 2016 c 205 s 2; 2009 c 556 s 5; 1992 c 205 s 201.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—1992 c 205: See notes following RCW 13.40.010.